Missouri, session 2026, SB1419.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.611, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.611,
to read as follows:
143.611. 1. As soon as practical after the return is
filed, the director of revenue shall examine it to determine
the correct amount of tax. If the director of revenue finds
that the amount of tax shown on the return is less than the
correct amount, he shall notify the taxpayer of the amount
of the deficiency proposed to be assessed. If the director
of revenue finds that the tax paid is more than the correct
amount, he shall credit the overpayment against any taxes
due under sections 143.011 to 143.996 from the taxpayer and
refund the difference. No deficiency shall be proposed and
no refund shall be made pursuant to this or any section of
sections 143.011 to 143.996 unless the amount exceeds one
dollar.
2. If the taxpayer fails to file an income tax return,
the director of revenue shall estimate the taxpayer's
taxable income and the tax thereon from any available
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1419 2
information and notify the taxpayer of the amount proposed
to be assessed as in the case of a deficiency.
3. The notice required by subsections 1 and 2 of this
section, hereafter referred to as a notice of deficiency,
shall set forth the reason for the proposed assessment. The
notice of deficiency shall be mailed by [certified or
registered] regular first class mail to the taxpayer at his
last known address, or delivered electronically at the
taxpayer's request. In the case of a combined return, the
notice of deficiency may be a single combined notice except
that if the director of revenue is notified by either spouse
that separate residences have been established he shall mail
notices to each spouse. If the taxpayer is deceased, is
under a legal disability, or, in the case of a corporation,
has terminated its existence, a notice of deficiency may be
mailed to his last known address unless the director of
revenue has received notice of the existence and address of
a person to receive notices with respect to such taxpayer.
✓